New Jersey, session 222, A262.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Beginning with the 2012-2013 school year, each school district shall incorporate instruction on the dangers of cell phone usage and text messaging while driving into the health education curriculum for students in grades 9 through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the Core Curriculum Content Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education. b.    The instruction shall provide students with: (1)  information concerning the correlation between distracted driving and erratic driving behavior, such as lane-weaving and sudden speed changes, and driving accidents; and (2)  statistics concerning the number of driving accidents, injuries, and fatalities resulting from cell phone usage and text messaging while driving. c.    The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with sample learning activities and resources designed to promote awareness of the dangers associated with cell phone usage and text messaging while driving. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.